dropN.twol
Alphabet
A B C Ç D E F G Ğ H I İ J K L M N O Ö P R S Ş T U Ü V Y Z
a b c ç d e f g ğ h ı i j k l m n o ö p r s ş t u ü v y z
%{A%}
%{I%}
%{D%}
%{C%}
%{K%}
%{SPC%}
%{DOUB%}
%(%{A%}%)
%-
%(%{I%}%)
%(n%):n
%(s%)
%(y%)
%{Ph1%}
%{Ph2%}
%{Ph3%}
%{Ph4%}
%{Ph5%}
%{Ph6%}
%{Ph7%}
%{Ph8%}
%{Ph9%}
%{rT%}
%{rÇ%}
%{rK%}
%{rP%}
%'
%{rEİ%}
%{rEÜ%}
%{rAU%}
%{rAI%}
;

Sets

Vow = A E I İ O Ö U Ü
		a e ı i o ö u ü %{Ph2%} %{Ph5%} %{rEİ%} %{rEÜ%} %{rAU%} %{rAI%} ;

Cons = B C Ç D F G Ğ H J K L M N P R S Ş T V Y Z
		b c ç d f g ğ h j k l m n p r s ş t v y z %{DOUB%} %{D%} %{C%} %{K%} 
		%{Ph1%} %{Ph3%} %{Ph4%} %{Ph6%} %{Ph7%} %{Ph8%} %{Ph9%} %{rT%} %{rÇ%} %{rK%} %{rP%} %(n%) ;

beforeN = B C Ç D F G Ğ H J K L M N P R S Ş T V Y Z
			b c ç d f g ğ h j k l m n p r s ş t v y z %(n%) %{DOUB%} ;

Rules


"Drop before (y)"
%(n%):0 <=> _ [%-: ]* [%(y%): ] [Cons: ];

"Drop before dI"
%(n%):0 <=> _ [%-: ]* [%{D%}: ] [%{I%}: ] ;

"Drop before -gil"
%(n%):0 <=> _ [%-: ]+ [ g: ] [ i: ] [l: ] ;

"Drop before space"
%(n%):0 <=> _ [%-: ]* [%{SPC%}: ] ;

"Drop after consonant when in genitive"
%(n%):0 <=> [Cons: ] [%-: ]+ _ [%{I%}: ] [n: ] ;

"Drop at the end"
%(n%):0 <=> _ [%-: ]+ .#. ;
